District of Columbia statutes.
2-1907

Oath of interpreter.

Before an interpreter appointed under this chapter begins to interpret, the interpreter shall take an oath or affirmation that the interpreter will make a true interpretation in an understandable manner to and for the person for whom the interpreter is appointed to the best of the interpreter’s skills and judgment.

Jan. 28, 1988, D.C. Law 7-62, § 8, 34 DCR 7426

History

1981 Ed., § 31-2707.

Prior Codifications